District of Columbia statutes.
34-1313.13

Application to amend order authorizing Underground Project Charges.

An application to amend an existing Commission order authorizing the electric company to impose and collect Underground Project Charges shall describe the purpose to be accomplished by the proposed amendment, the financial impacts, if any, to the electric company’s customers that are likely to result from the amendment, if approved, and shall include each item set forth in § 34-1313.08(c). The application to amend shall apply only to future Underground Project Charges and any approval of an application shall allow for recovery by the electric company through Underground Project Charges of any prudent and reasonable expenses or costs for any project previously approved by the Commission.

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 313, 61 DCR 1882